Maryland, session 2026, SB0932.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 14–1330 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1330.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “GENERAL GEOGRAPHICAL LOCATION” MEANS, AT THE
TIME OF ACCESS TO A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM, THE CITY STATE, PROVINCE, OR
OTHER COMPARABLE SUBDIVISION AND THE COUNTRY DERIVED FROM THE
INTERNET PROTOCOL ADDRESS OF THE NETWORK CONNECTION THROUGH WHICH A
USER’S DEVICE ACCESSES THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM.
(II) “GENERAL GEOGRAPHICAL LOCATION” DOES NOT
INCLUDE:
1. PRECISE GEOLOCATION DATA, AS DEFINED IN §
14–4701 OF THIS TITLE; OR
2. PRECISE GEOLOCATION, AS DEFINED IN § 14–4801 OF
THIS TITLE.
(3) (I) “SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM” MEANS A WEBSITE, A DESKTOP
OR MOBILE APPLICATION, OR AN AUGMENTED OR VIRTUAL REALITY APPLICATION,
PUBLIC OR SEMIPUBLIC INTERNET–BASED SERVICE OR APPLICATION THAT HAS A
STATE USER AND THAT:
(I) 1. ALLOWS A PERSON TO BECOME A REGISTERED USER,
ESTABLISH AN ACCOUNT, OR CREATE A PROFILE FOR THE PURPOSE OF ALLOWING

SENATE BILL 932 3
THE USER TO CREATE, SHARE, AND VIEW USER–GENERATED CONTENT THROUGH
THE ACCOUNT OR PROFILE USING THE SERVICE OR APPLICATION;
(II) 2. ENABLES A USER TO GENERATE CONTENT THAT CAN
BE VIEWED BY OTHER USERS OF THE PLATFORM SERVICE OR APPLICATION AND
VIEW CONTENT GENERATED BY OTHER USERS OF THE SERVICE OR APPLICATION;
AND
(III) 3. PRIMARILY SERVES AS A MEDIUM FOR USERS TO
INTERACT SOCIALLY WITH CONTENT GENERATED BY OTHER USERS OF THE
PLATFORM SERVICE OR APPLICATION; AND
4. POPULATES A LIST OF OTHER USERS WITH WHOM A
USER SHARES A SOCIAL CONNECTION WITHIN THE SERVICE OR APPLICATION.
(II) “SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM” DOES NOT INCLUDE A SERVICE
OR APPLICATION:
1. SOLELY ON THE BASIS THAT THE SERVICE OR
APPLICATION OFFERS E–MAIL OR DIRECT MESSAGING FUNCTIONS;
2. THAT IS COMPOSED PRIMARILY OF CONTENT
PRESELECTED BY THE SERVICE OR APPLICATION PROVIDER AND FOR WHICH ANY
COMMUNICATIONS FUNCTION IS INCIDENTAL TO, DIRECTLY RELATED TO, OR
DEPENDENT ON THE PROVISION OF THE PRESELECTED CONTENT; OR
3. FOR INTERACTIVE GAMING.
(4) “STATE USER” MEANS A USER OF A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM
WHOSE GENERAL GEOGRAPHICAL LOCATION IS IN THE STATE.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PERSON THAT OPERATES A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM SHALL DISPLAY TO A STATE
USER THE GENERAL GEOGRAPHICAL LOCATION OF EACH USER WHOSE ACCOUNT IS
VISIBLE TO THE STATE USER ON THE SOCIAL MEDIAL PLATFORM.
(2) A PERSON THAT OPERATES A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM MAY NOT
DISPLAY THE GENERAL GEOGRAPHICAL LOCATION OF A USER WHO THE:
(I) THE PERSON KNOWS OR HAS REASON TO KNOW IS A MINOR;
OR

SENATE BILL 932
(II) CERTIFIES PARTICIPATION IN THE ADDRESS
CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 7, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) A PERSON THAT OPERATES A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM SHALL
ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO ENABLE A STATE USER TO MAKE THE CERTIFICATION
DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT §§ 13–407, 13–408, AND 13–411
OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.